Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Ignition Interlock Licenses and Devices

189A.340.
Ignition interlock licenses — Provider fees.

If a person’s license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (e), or (f), the sole license the person shall be eligible for is an ignition interlock license pursuant to this section.

If a person’s license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c) or (d), the person shall be eligible for an ignition interlock license pursuant to this section and may be eligible for a hardship license pursuant to KRS

189A.410

.

A person may apply for an ignition interlock license anytime, including after receiving the notices under KRS

189A.105

or after his or her license has been suspended pursuant to this chapter.

If at the time the person applies for an ignition interlock license, the person’s license has been suspended pursuant to this chapter, the person shall be authorized to drive to:

An ignition interlock device provider to have a functioning ignition interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle; and

The Transportation Cabinet to obtain an ignition interlock license;

This paragraph shall only apply within fourteen (14) days of the date printed on the ignition interlock approval letter issued by the Transportation Cabinet and if the person has the ignition interlock approval letter in the motor vehicle or motorcycle.

Before the Transportation Cabinet shall issue an ignition interlock license, the person shall:

Submit an application for an ignition interlock license;

Provide proof of motor vehicle insurance;

Provide an ignition interlock certificate of installation issued by an ignition interlock device provider; and

Provide any other information required by administrative regulations promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS

189A.350

.

An ignition interlock license shall restrict the person to operating only a motor vehicle or motorcycle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device, unless the person qualifies for an employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section. This restriction shall remain in place for:

If a person’s license was suspended pretrial pursuant to KRS

189A.200

, the required suspension period under KRS

189A.200

(6);

If a person’s license was suspended pursuant to KRS

189A.070

or

189A.107

:

The required suspension period under KRS

189A.070

(1); and

If the maximum suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1)(a) has not yet been met, until the Transportation Cabinet has received a declaration from the person’s ignition interlock device provider, in a form provided or approved by the cabinet, certifying that none of the violations outlined in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has occurred:

For a first offense within a ten (10) year period of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) or for any offense of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), in the ninety (90) consecutive days; and

For all subsequent offenses within a ten (10) year period of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), one hundred twenty (120) consecutive days; prior to the date of releasing the ignition interlock device restriction.

If any of the following occur, it shall be a violation of the ninety (90) or one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement:

Failure to take any random breath alcohol concentration test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the motor vehicle or motorcycle was not occupied by a driver at the time of the missed test;

Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.02 or lower unless a subsequent test performed within ten (10) minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.02, and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;

Failure of the person, or his or her designee, to appear at the ignition interlock device provider when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device;

Failure of the person to pay fees established pursuant to subsection (7) of this section;

Tampering with an installed ignition interlock device with the intent of rendering it defective; or

Altering, concealing, hiding, or attempting to alter, conceal, or hide, the person’s identity from the ignition interlock device’s camera while providing a breath sample;

If a person’s license was suspended pursuant to KRS

189A.090

, for the required suspension period under KRS

189A.090

(2); or

If a person’s license suspension was extended pursuant to KRS

189A.345

, the required suspension period under KRS

189A.345

(1).

The time period a person:

Holds a valid ignition interlock license pursuant to this section; or

Receives alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential facility;

shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the suspension periods detailed in subsection (4) of this section.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the Transportation Cabinet shall give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period the person:

Held a valid ignition interlock license; or

Received alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential facility.

A person shall not receive day-for-day credit for days the person utilized the employer exemption in accordance with subsection (6) of this section and drove an employer’s motor vehicle or motorcycle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.

A person with an ignition interlock license may operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if:

The person is required to operate an employer’s motor vehicle or motorcycle in the course and scope of employment; and

The business entity that owns the motor vehicle or motorcycle is not owned or controlled by the person.

To qualify for the employer exemption, the person shall provide the Transportation Cabinet with a sworn statement from his or her employer stating that the person and business entity meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an ignition interlock device provider may charge the following fees:

An installation fee for an alternative fuel vehicle or a vehicle with a push button starter not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130), an installation fee for all other vehicles not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

A monthly fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

A removal fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30);

A reset fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50); or

A missed appointment fee not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35).

A person who is issued an ignition interlock license shall pay fees as established in his or her lease agreement with the ignition interlock device provider for any ignition interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle. However, the fees shall never be more than allowed under paragraph (a) of this subsection and are subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection.

Any person who has an income:

At or below two hundred percent (200%) but above one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only seventy-five percent (75%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;

At or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) but above one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only fifty percent (50%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; or

At or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only twenty-five percent (25%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;

As used in this paragraph, “federal poverty guidelines” has the same meaning as in KRS

205.5621

. The Transportation Cabinet shall determine the person’s income and where that income places the person on the federal poverty guidelines.

Neither the Commonwealth, the Transportation Cabinet, nor any unit of state or local government shall be responsible for payment of any costs associated with an ignition interlock device.

For a person issued an ignition interlock license under this section who is residing outside of Kentucky, the Transportation Cabinet may accept an ignition interlock certificate of installation from an ignition interlock device provider authorized to do business in the state where the person resides if the ignition interlock device meets the requirements of that state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 467, § 27, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 171, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2015 ch. 124, § 8, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 85, § 7, effective April 9, 2016; repealed and reenacted by 2019 ch. 103, § 15, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 51, § 27, effective July 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 7 of that Act.

(6/24/2015). During codification, the Reviser of Statutes has changed the numbering of subsection (1) of this statute from the way it appeared in
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 124, sec. 8. None of the text of the subsection was changed.

(6/24/2015). During codification, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in subsection (1) of this statute from the way it appeared in
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 8 by changing a citation to “ KRS

189A.010

(a), (b), (e), or (f)” to read “ KRS

189A.010

(1)(a), (b), (e), or (f).” None of the text of the subsection was changed.

189A.345.
Prohibition against use of vehicle other than for purpose authorized by ignition interlock license — Penalties for unlawful acts relating to ignition interlock licenses and devices.

No person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

shall operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle without a functioning ignition interlock device or at any time, place, or for any purpose other than authorized under KRS

189A.340

.

Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, and shall have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for the initial period of suspension under KRS

189A.070

for an additional six (6) months.

No person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

shall request, permit, or allow another person to:

Start a motor vehicle or motorcycle equipped with an ignition interlock device; or

Take a subsequent breath alcohol concentration test;

for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle or motorcycle for that person subject to the ignition interlock license to drive in violation of KRS

189A.340

.

Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

For a first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and

For a second or subsequent offense, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

No person shall start a motor vehicle or motorcycle equipped with an ignition interlock device for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle or motorcycle to a person subject to the prohibition established in KRS

189A.340

.

Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

For a first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and

For a second or subsequent offense, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

No person shall:

Knowingly install a defective ignition interlock device on a motor vehicle or motorcycle;

Tamper with an installed ignition interlock device with the intent of rendering it defective; or

Alter, conceal, hide, or attempt to alter, conceal, or hide, the person’s identity from the ignition interlock device’s camera while providing a breath sample.

Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

For a first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and

For a second or subsequent offense, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and be prohibited from installing ignition interlock devices or directing others in the installation of ignition interlock devices.

No person shall direct another person to install a defective ignition interlock device on a motor vehicle or motorcycle when the person giving the direction knows that the ignition interlock device is defective.

Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

For a first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and

For a second or subsequent offense, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and be prohibited from directing others in the installation of ignition interlock devices or installing ignition interlock devices.

No person shall knowingly assist a person who is issued an ignition interlock license in making a false statement in order to qualify for the employer exemption under KRS 189A.340(6).

Any person who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and shall have his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle operator’s license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for six (6) months.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 467, § 28, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 171, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 173, § 31, effective July 12, 2006; 2014, ch. 71, § 9, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 124, § 9, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 16, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.350.
Administrative regulations promulgated by Transportation Cabinet for ignition interlock licenses devices, and providers — Certification of devices and device providers — Provider contract provisions — Transportation Cabinet’s power to require ignition interlock device providers to pay certain fees — Fees collected to be paid to ignition interlock administration fund.

The Transportation Cabinet shall:

Issue ignition interlock license application forms and other forms necessary for the implementation of ignition interlock licenses;

Create a uniform ignition interlock certificate of installation to be provided to a defendant by an ignition interlock provider upon installation of an ignition interlock device;

Create an ignition interlock license. The ignition interlock license may be a regular driver’s or operator’s license with an ignition interlock restriction printed on the license;

Require a person issued an ignition interlock license to maintain motor vehicle insurance for the duration of his or her ignition interlock license;

Certify ignition interlock devices approved for use in the Commonwealth;

Publish and periodically update on the Transportation Cabinet Web site a list of contact information, including a link to the Web site of each certified ignition interlock device provider, with the entity appearing first on the list changing on a statistically random basis each time a unique visitor visits the list of the approved ignition interlock installers and the approved servicing and monitoring entities;

Monitor the ignition interlock device service locations of providers and create a random or designated selection process to require a provider to provide ignition interlock device services in any area of the Commonwealth which the Transportation Cabinet determines is underserved by providers; and

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

The Transportation Cabinet shall not create any ignition interlock license or device violations in administrative regulations. The sole ignition interlock license or device violations are established in this chapter.

No model of ignition interlock device shall be certified for use in the Commonwealth unless it meets or exceeds standards promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet pursuant to this section.

In bidding for a contract with the Transportation Cabinet to provide ignition interlock devices and servicing or monitoring or both, the ignition interlock device provider shall take into account that some defendants will not be able to pay the full amount of the fees established pursuant to KRS 189A.340(7)(a).

Any contract between the cabinet and an ignition interlock device provider shall include the following:

A requirement that the provider accept reduced payments as a full payment for all purposes from persons determined to be at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty guidelines by the Transportation Cabinet as provided by KRS 189A.340(7)(c);

A requirement that no unit of state or local government and no public officer or employee shall be liable for the cost of purchasing or installing the ignition interlock device or associated costs;

A requirement that the provider agree to a price for the cost of leasing or purchasing an ignition interlock device and any associated servicing or monitoring fees during the duration of the contract. This price shall not be increased but may be reduced during the duration of the contract;

Requirements and standards for the servicing, inspection, and monitoring of the ignition interlock device;

Provisions for training for service center technicians and clients;

A requirement that the provider electronically transmit reports on driving activity within seven (7) days of servicing an ignition interlock device to the Transportation Cabinet, prosecuting attorney, and defendant;

Requirements for a transition plan for the ignition interlock device provider before the provider leaves the state to ensure that continuous monitoring is achieved and to provide a minimum forty-five (45) day notice to the cabinet of any material change to the design of the ignition interlock device, or any changes to the provider’s installation, servicing, or monitoring capabilities;

A requirement that, before beginning work, the ignition interlock device provider have and maintain insurance as approved by the cabinet, including provider’s public liability and property damage insurance, in an amount determined by the cabinet, that covers the cost of defects or problems with product design, materials, workmanship during manufacture, calibration, installation, device removal, or any use thereof;

A provision requiring that an ignition interlock provider agree to hold harmless and indemnify any unit of state or local government, public officer, or employee from all claims, demands, and actions, as a result of damage or injury to persons or property which may arise, directly or indirectly, out of any action or omission by the ignition interlock provider relating to the installation, service, repair, use, or removal of an ignition interlock device;

A requirement that a warning label to be affixed to each ignition interlock device upon installation. The label shall contain a warning that any person who tampers with, circumvents, or otherwise misuse the device commits a violation of law under KRS

189A.345

;

A requirement that a provider will remove an ignition interlock device without cost, if the device is found to be defective;

A requirement that a provider have at least one (1) ignition interlock device service location in each Transportation Cabinet highway district; and

A requirement that a provider accept assignments to provide ignition interlock device services in areas of the Commonwealth which the Transportation Cabinet determines are underserved by providers in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

The Transportation Cabinet may require ignition interlock device providers to pay the following fees:

An application fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

An annual renewal fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200);

An annual service inspection fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100); or

A revisit fee for a failed inspection not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

Any fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid to the ignition interlock administration fund established in KRS

189A.380

.

HISTORY:

Former § KRS §

189A.500

was renumbered to be §

189A.350

, by 2019, ch. 103, § 17, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 91, § 37, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.360.
Nonrefundable application fee for ignition interlock license. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 26, effective July 1, 1991; Former §

189A.420

was renumbered to be §

189A.360

, by 2019, ch. 103, § 18, effective July 1, 2020; repealed by 2020 ch. 91, § 75, effective April 15, 2020.

189A.370.
Administrative appeals process for ignition interlock license.

In every instance where the Transportation Cabinet takes action which affects:

A person’s eligibility for an ignition interlock license;

The calculation of a person’s ninety (90) or one hundred twenty (120) consecutive days;

The calculation of a person’s day-for-day credit;

A person’s eligibility for an employer exemption; or

The calculation of a person’s income and where that income places the person on the federal poverty guidelines;

under KRS

189A.340

, that action shall include a letter that notifies the person of the action, informs the person of the basis of the action, and informs the person of his or her right to request an informal hearing within twenty (20) days of receiving the notice.

The informal hearing shall be scheduled as early as practical within twenty (20) days after receipt of the request at a time and place designated by the cabinet.

The informal hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer designated by the commissioner and shall adhere to the requirements of KRS

13B.090

. At the hearing, the complainant shall be given a statement of why the cabinet took the action, and both the cabinet and the complainant shall have the right to be advised by an attorney with the burden of proof resting with the complainant. After the hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare a written report of the hearing with a recommended decision to the commissioner. The final decision shall be made by the commissioner. As used in this paragraph, “commissioner” means the commissioner of the cabinet’s Office of Vehicle Regulation.

An aggrieved party may file a request for reconsideration of the commissioner’s final decision with the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services within twenty (20) days after receipt of the informal hearing decision. The Office of Legal Services shall issue a decision within twenty (20) days after receipt of the request.

An aggrieved party may appeal the Office of Legal Services’ decision within twenty (20) days after receipt of the decision, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 103, § 19, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.380.
Ignition interlock administration fund.

The ignition interlock administration fund is created as a restricted fund. The restricted fund shall consist of funds deposited pursuant to KRS

189A.050

and

189A.350

. The Transportation Cabinet shall administer the fund.

The funds deposited pursuant to:

KRS

189A.050

shall be appropriated to the Department of Vehicle Regulation; and

KRS

189A.350

shall be appropriated to the Office of Highway Safety; for administrative costs associated with ignition interlock pursuant to this chapter.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

Any interest earned on moneys in the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 91, § 38, effective April 15, 2020.